Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska14-365.13
Sewerage systems and sewage disposal plants; sections; cumulative.

The provisions of sections 14-365.01 to 14-365.13 shall be independent of and in addition to any other provisions of the laws of the State of Nebraska with reference to sewage disposal plants and sewerage systems, including any storm sewer system, in metropolitan cities. The provisions of sections 14-365.01 to 14-365.13 shall not be considered amendatory of or limited by any other provision of the laws of the State of Nebraska, except as provided in section 14-365.12.

Laws 1953, c. 24, § 13, p. 104.